Hawaii statutes.
[§392-23] Duration of benefit payments.
Temporary disability benefits shall be payable for any period of disability
following the expiration of the waiting period required in section 392-24.

The duration of benefit payments shall not
exceed twenty-six weeks for any period of disability or during any benefit
year. [L 1969, c 148, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next